District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.12

Final decision by Mayor’s agent.

(a)

The Mayor’s agent shall render a final decision on the claimant’s appeal no later than 60 days after the date of his or her initial request for a hearing. If, however, the date of the hearing is postponed at the claimant’s request, or if the claimant submits new evidence following the close of his or her hearing, causing it to be reopened, the length of the postponement or the delay caused by the reopening may be added to the 60-day period.

(b)

The Mayor’s agent shall overrule the hearing officer in instances where he or she does not agree with findings, conclusions, or recommendations presented for decision. In such case, the reasons for the Mayor’s agent’s decision shall be specified in writing and shall be made a part of the hearing record.

(c)

All decisions of the Mayor’s agent shall be final and binding upon the Mayor and shall be put into effect immediately unless otherwise specifically indicated in the action. When the hearing decision is favorable to the claimant, or when the Mayor’s agent decides in favor of the claimant prior to the hearing, the Mayor’s agent shall authorize corrected payments retroactively to the date the incorrect action was taken.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1012, 29 DCR 1060
This section is referenced in § 4-210.13.
1981 Ed., § 3-210.12.